Utah statutes.
76-10-404.   Exemptions.
This part does not apply to any member or employee of the Armed Forces of the
United States, allied armed forces personnel, a federal or state governmental
agency, or a private entity, who is engaged in lawful activity within the
scope of his or her employment, if the person is authorized or licensed to
manufacture, possess, sell, deliver, display, or otherwise engage in activity
relative to this section and if the person is in compliance with applicable
federal and state law.
